All pretending!-- she said, opening and closing her umbrella.
'Yes, with what purpose?'
'To appear better in front of men, in front of themselves, in front of God, to deceive everyone.'
No, I can't do this anymore!
To be a bad man, but at least not a liar, not a liar!
'Who is the liar?' 'Absolutely said Varenka. 'You speak as if...'
But Kitty was in a violent seizure.
She wouldn't let her finish.
'I'm not talking about you, I'm not talking about you at all.
You're perfect.
Yeah, yeah, I know you're perfect, but what do you do, that I'm bad?
That wouldn't have happened if I wasn't bad.
So let me be who I am, but I won't pretend.
What do I care about Anna Pavlovna?
Let them live as they please, and I will.
I can't be each other...
And it's not the same thing, it's the wrong thing!
'What's wrong with that? 'In perplexity, Varenka said.
'It's not the same.
I can't live the life of my heart, and you live by the rules.
I just fell in love with you, and all you have to do is save me, teach me!
'You are unjust,' said Varenka.
'I'm not saying anything about others, I'm talking about myself.
'Kiti!' said the mother's voice, 'come here, show your father your crowns.
Kitty looked proudly, not having made peace with her friend, took a crown from the table in a box and went to her mother's.
'What is wrong with you?
Why are you so red? 'The mother and father said to her in one voice.'
'Nothing,' she replied, 'I will come and run back.
"She's still here!" she thought. 'What will I tell her, my God! What I did, what I said!
Why did I hurt her?
What am I supposed to do?
What am I gonna tell her?" 'I thought Kitty had stopped by the door.'
Varenka, wearing a hat and with an umbrella in her hand, sat by the table, looking at the spring that Kitty broke.
She raised her head.
'Varynka, forgive me, forgive me! I whispered to Kitty when I approached her. 'I don't remember what I said. I...
'I really didn't want to upset you,' said Varenka, smiling.
The world was made.
But with my father's arrival for Kitty, the whole world she lived in changed.
She didn't give up everything she found out, but she realized she was lying to herself, thinking that she could be what she wanted to be.
It was as if she had woken up; felt all the difficulty without pretence and bragging to hold on to the height she wanted to rise to; she also felt the weight of this world of grief, disease, death, in which she lived; she had been tormented by the effort that she had used to love it, and quickly wanted fresh air, to Russia, to Ergusho, where, as she learned from the letter, her sister Dolly had already moved with her children.
But her love for Varenka hasn't diminished.
By saying goodbye, Kitty begged her to come to Russia.
'I will come when you get married,' said Varenka.
'I will never go out.
'Well, then I will never come.'
'Well, that's why I'm getting married.
Look, remember the promise! 'Oh, Kitty said.'
The doctor's predictions were justified.
Kitty returned home to Russia, cured.
She wasn't as carefree and funny as she used to be, but she was calm, and her Moscow grief became a memory.
PART THREE
Sergei Ivanovich Koznyshev wanted to take a break from his mental work and, instead of going abroad as usual, came to the village to visit his brother at the end of May.
He believed that the best life was a village. He's here now to enjoy his brother's life.
Konstantin Levin was very happy, especially since he wasn't expecting his brother Nikolai this summer.
But despite his love and respect for Sergei Ivanovich, Konstantin Levin was uncomfortable in the village with his brother.
He was embarrassed, even uncomfortable to see his brother's attitude toward the village. For Konstantin Levin the village was a place of life, i.e. joy, suffering, labour; for Sergei Ivanovic the village was, on the one hand, a rest from work; and, on the other hand, a useful antidote to spoil, which he took with pleasure and consciousness of his usefulness.
For Konstantin Levin, the village was so good that it represented work that was undoubtedly useful; for Sergei Ivanovic, the village was especially good that nothing could and should be done there.
Moreover, Koznyshev's attitude towards the people included several boxes of Konstantin.
Koznyshev said that he loved and knew the people, and often talked to the men, that he could do well without pretending or breaking, and from each such conversation he drew general data in favour of the people and in proof that he knew the people. This attitude against the people was not pleasing to Konstantin Levin.
For Constantin, the people were only the main participant in the common work, and despite all the respect and some level of love for the man that he himself had given to the man, as he himself said, probably with the milk of the baba feeder, he, as a participant in the common cause, sometimes in admiration for the strength, mildness, justice of these people, very often, when in general other qualities were required, came to anger the people for their carelessness, sloppyness, drunkness, lies.
Constantin Levin, had he been asked if he loved the people, he would not have been sure how to respond.
He loved and didn't love people as much as he loved people.
Of course, as a kind man, he loved more than he did not love people, and so did the people. But to love or not to love a people as special as anything, he could not, because not only did he live with the people, not only his interests were connected to the people, but he considered himself to be part of the people, he saw no special qualities and shortcomings in himself and the people, and he could not oppose the people.
Moreover, although he had long lived in the closest relationship to men as master and mediator, and most importantly, as counselor (husbands believed him and went to see him for 40 years), he had no definite judgement about the people, and to the question whether he knew the people would be as difficult to answer as to whether he loved the people.
To say he knows the people would be the same for him to say he knows the people.
He constantly watched and recognized all sorts of people, including men, whom he considered to be good and interesting, and constantly noticed the new features in them, changed their views and made new ones. Koznyshev across the street.
Just as he loved and praised the village life as opposed to the one he didn't love, so did the people as much as he loved the class of people he didn't love, and just as he knew the people as opposed to people at all.
His methodological wisdom clearly established certain forms of people &apos; s life, derived in part from the people &apos; s life itself, but largely from the contrast.
He never changed his mind about the people and his compassion for them.
In the differences between the brothers in the judgement of the people, Sergei Ivanovic always defeated his brother precisely by the fact that Sergei Ivanov had certain notions of the people, its nature, properties and tastes; but Konstantin Levin had no definite and unshakeable notion, so that in these disputes Konstantin had always been seen as contradicting himself.
For Sergei Ivanovic, his younger brother was a good fellow, with a heart set up well (as he expressed in French), but intelligently, though fast, but subservient to the impressions of a minute and therefore filled with contradictions.
With his older brother's condescendingness, he sometimes explained the meaning of things to him, but he could not find the pleasure of arguing with him because he broke him too easily.
Constantin Levin looked at his brother as a man of great mind and education, noble in the highest meaning of the word and gifted with the ability to act for the common good.
But in the depths of his soul, the older he grew and the closer he knew his brother, the more and more he thought that this ability to work for the common good, which he felt completely deprived, might not be quality, but rather a lack of something -- not a lack of good, honest, noble desires and tastes, but a lack of the strength of life, what is called the heart of the desire that compels a person out of all the countless ways of life to choose one and to want one.
The more he recognized his brother, the more he noticed that both Sergei Ivanovic and many others, for the common good, had not been put to this love of the common good in their hearts, but had reason to think that it was good to do it, and that was why they had done it.
Levin's suggestion was also confirmed by Levin's remark that his brother no longer took to heart questions about the common good and the immortality of the soul, rather than about the chess party or the witty arrangement of the new machine.
In addition, Konstantin Levin was embarrassed in the village with his brother because Levin was constantly busy in the village, especially in the summer, and he lacked a long summer day to redo what was needed, while Sergei Ivanovic was resting.
But even though he was resting now, i.e. not working on his essay, he was so accustomed to mental activity that he liked to speak in a beautiful, concise form of thought that came to him and loved to listen to someone.
The most ordinary and natural listener was his brother. So, despite the friendly simplicity of their relationship, Konstantin was embarrassed to leave him alone.
Koznyshev liked to lie in the grass in the sun and lie like this, hot and lazy.
'You will not believe it!' he said to his brother, 'what a delight it is for me to have this forelock laziness. Not a single thought in your head, not even a ball to swing.
But Konstantin Levin was bored to sit and listen to him, especially because he knew that without him he was being driven to an undisturbed field and God knows how, if not seen; and the incisors in the plows would not be moved, but would be filmed, and would then say that the plows of fiction were empty and whether or not Andreevna was a case, etc.
'May you walk in the heat,' said Koznyshev.
'No, I'll just run into the office for a minute,' said Levin, and ran into the field.
In the early days of June, it was reported that Agatha Mikhaylovna's nanny and housekeeper had carried a bottle of fungus she had just sent into the basement, slipped, fell and lost her hand in the brushes.
A young chattery student, an Earth doctor, just graduated. He took a look at his hand, said it wasn't dislocated, put on compresses and, while staying for lunch, apparently enjoyed a conversation with the famous Sergei Ivanovich Koznyshev and told him to show him his enlightened view of things, all the country gossip, complaining about the evil state of the land.
Koznyshev listened carefully, asked questions and, excited by the new listener, spoke and made several marks and valid remarks, which were respectfully appreciated by a young doctor, and came to his friend, a lively state of spirit, to which he usually came after a brilliant and lively conversation.
After Dr. Sergei Ivanovic left, he wanted to drive with a rod to the river.
He loved to fish and was proud to love such a stupid thing.
Konstantin Levin, who had to go to the groin and the meadows, volunteered to take his brother to the convertible.
It was the time of the year that the summer passed when the harvest of this year had already been determined when the crop of next year began to care for the seed of the year and the mooses had come to pass, when all the groves had been punctured and, grey green, not filled with salt, yet lightly pissed in the wind, when the green oats, with the leaves of the yellow herbs that had spread over them, had been rippled in the later fields, when the early Greek had already crumbled, hiding the earth, when the slaughtered couple with the deserted roads that had not taken the soda were ploughed up to half; when the sucked-out piles of manure were plowed in the springs along with the honey herbs, and at the bottom, waiting for the mos, there were a full-scale mead with the black piles of the gutter.
There was a time when in rural work there would be a short break before the beginning of the annual and all-powerful clean-up of the people.
The harvest was beautiful, and there were bright, hot summer days with rugged short nights.
The brothers had to go through the woods to go to the meadows.
Koznyshev was always admiring the beauty of the forest that had fallen out of the leaves, pointing out to his brother the dark side of the shadowy side, which was being sung by yellow stickers preparing for the color of the old lip, and in the emerald, the brilliant young runaways of this year's trees.
Konstantin Levin did not like to talk and listen to the beauty of nature.
Words took away his beauty from what he saw.
He gave in to his brother, but he hesitated to think of something else.
When they passed through the woods, his attention was absorbed by the view of the steam field on the bugre, where the yellow grass, where the cages were general and cut, where the piles were dumped and where the ploughed was.
The field was driven by a wheelbarrow.
Levin counted the carts, was satisfied that all the things that were needed would be taken away, and his thoughts turned when he saw the meadows to the question of the elbow.
He always felt something special about taking care of the living in the hay.
On arriving at the meadow, Levin stopped the horse.
The morning dew was still down on the bush of grass, and Koznyshev asked him not to wash his legs, but to take himself to the meadow in the convertible to the crustite bush from which the oxen were taken.
As sorry as it was for Konstantin Levin to mess with his grass, he moved into the meadow.
The tall grass softly wrapped around the wheels and legs of the horse, leaving its seeds on wet sticks and heads.
The brother sat under the bush, dissecting the rods, and Levin took the horse away, tied it up, and entered into the great grey green sea of the meadow in the real wind.
Silk herbs with snooping seeds were almost within the belt of the fill.
After crossing the meadow, Konstantin Levin went out and met an old man with a swollen eye carrying a trench with the bees.
'What? Or did you catch me, Fomic? 'He asked.'
'What a catch, Constantin Mytrich!
Just keep yours safe.
This is the second time a friend's gone... thank you guys for the ride.
You're pawning. Pull the horse away, get on the road.
'Well, what do you say, Fomic, 'to mow or to wait?'
'Well, then! We think it's time for Petrov's day.
You've always had your hair cut before.
Well, God will give good herbs.
The bastard's gonna be spacious.
'And the weather, do you think?'
'This is God's business. Maybe the weather will.
Levin approached his brother.
I didn't catch anything, but Koznyshev didn't miss me, and he seemed to be in the most fun mood.
Levin saw that, angry with the doctor, he wanted to talk.
Levin, on the other hand, wanted to go home rather to order the summoning of the kosses by tomorrow, and to resolve the doubt about the handmaiden, which greatly occupied him.
'Well, let's go,' he said.
'What's the rush?
Sit down.
You're so exhausted, though!
It's not a catch, but it's good. Any hunting is good that you're dealing with nature.
What a beauty this steel water is! 'He said.' 'These banks are meadows,' he continued, 'always remind me of a riddle,' you know? And the grass says to the water, and we go, and we go, and we go.
'I do not know this riddle,' Levin answered with sadness.
'You know, I've been thinking about you,' said Sergei Ivanovich. 'It doesn't look like anything you're doing in the county, as this doctor told me; he's a very stupid kid.
And I told you and I said, "It's not good that you don't go to meetings and get rid of the earthly business at all.
If decent people leave, of course, everything will go God knows how.
We pay money, they pay salaries, and there's no schools, no nurses, no birth money, no drugstore, nothing.
'I have tried,' Levin answered quietly and reluctantly, 'I cannot! Come on, let's go!
'What can't you do?
I admit I don't understand.
Evening, I do not allow any impropriety. Is it just laziness?
'Neither, nor the other, nor the third.'
'I have tried and I see that there is nothing I can do,' said Levin.
He didn't get much into what his brother said.
When he looked behind the river at the field, he was picking up something black, but he couldn't tell whether it was a horse or an orderman on top.
'Why can't you do anything?
You tried, and you didn't succeed, and you obey.
How can you not have egoism?
'Empathy,' said Levin, who was hurt by the living words of his brother, 'I do not understand.
When I was told at the university that others understood integral numeracy, and I don't understand it, it's ego. But we need to be convinced first that we need to have known skills for these cases and, above all, that all these cases are very important.
'Well, then! Doesn't it matter? 'Oh, Koznyshev said, who was hurting for the living and that his brother found what was his concern irrelevant, and in particular that he apparently did not listen to him very much.'
'I don't think it's important, doesn't take me away, what do you want?' 'I answered Levin, considering that what I saw was an orderr, and that the orderman probably let the men off the groin.' They've moved the juices.
"Did you smell it already?" 'He thought.'
'Well, listen, though,' said his older brother, frowned upon his beautiful smart face, 'there are limits to everything.
It is very good to be a weirdo and a sincere man and not to love a lie, &quot; I know all this; but what you say either doesn &apos; t make sense or has very bad meaning.
How do you find it irrelevant that the people you love, as you say...
"I never assured you," thought Konstantin Levin.
- dying without help?
Stupid women make babies, and the people will be ignorant, and they will remain in the hands of every writer, and you will be given the means to help them, and you will not help them, because you don't think it matters.
And Sergei Ivanovic made him a dilemma: either you're so undeveloped that you can't see everything you can do, or you don't want to compromise your calm, your vanity, I don't know what to do.
Constantin Levin felt that all he had to do was submit or confess his lack of love for the common cause. And it insulted him and upset him.
'Both of them,' he said with determination. 'I can't see that I can...'
Can't you put the money well enough to give me a doctor's help?
'You can't, I think...'
Four thousand square yards of our village, with our johns, the mites, the laborer sometimes, I don't see the ability to provide medical care everywhere.
I don't believe in medicine at all.
'Well, let me; it is not fair...'
I'll give you thousands of examples...
Well, what about schools?
'Why schools?
'What are you saying?
Is there any doubt about the benefits of education?
If it's good for you, it's good for everyone.
Konstantin Levin felt morally attached to the wall, so he heated up and made an involuntary statement of the main reason for his indifference to the common cause.
'Maybe it's all good; but why would I care about the establishment of medical posts, which I never use, and schools where I won't send my children, where the peasants don't want to send the children, and I don't believe it's necessary to send them? 'He said.'
Koznyshev was surprised for a moment by this unexpected view of the case; but he immediately drew up a new plan for the attack.
He kept quiet, took out one rod, threw it over, and smiled and turned to his brother.
'Well, let me...'
First of all, the medical facility was needed.
So we sent for Agatha Mikhaylovna for an Earth doctor.
'Well, I think the arm will remain a crooked one.'
'This is another question...'
Then a smart man, you need a better and more expensive employee.
'No, ask anyone you want,' answered Constantin Levin with determination. 'A literate worker is much worse.
And the roads cannot be repaired; and the bridges will both be set up and stolen.
'But, frowning,' said Koznyshev, who did not like contradictions, and especially those who constantly jumped from one to another and introduced new arguments without any connection, so it was not possible to know what to answer, &quot; that is not the case.
Let me.
Do you recognize that education is good for the people?
'I admit,' said Levin inadvertently, and immediately thought that he had not said what he thought.
He felt that if he admitted it, he would be proved to be saying nothing that made no sense.
As he will be proved, he did not know, but he knew that it would surely be logically proved to him, and he was waiting for that proof.
The case is much easier than Konstantin Levin expected.
'If you admit it to be good,' said Sergei Ivanovic, 'you, as an honest man, can neither love nor empathize with such a cause and therefore do not want to work for him.
'But I do not yet recognize this as a good thing,' said Konstantin Levin, blushing.
You just said...
'I mean, I don't recognize it as good or possible.
'You can't know that without trying.'
'Well, let's say,' said Levin, though he did not think it at all, 'let's say so; but I still don't see why I'm going to take care of it.
'What do you mean?
No, if we're talking, explain it to me from a philosophical point of view,' said Levin.
'I do not understand the philosophy here,' said Koznyshev, as Levin seemed, as if he had not recognized his brother's right to talk about philosophy.
And that annoyed Levin.
'Here's the point! 'Cause he's hot, he's talking. 'I think the engine of all our actions is a personal happiness.'
Now I, as a nobleman, see nothing in the earthly institutions that will contribute to my well-being.
The roads are no better, nor can they be better; my horses drive me in bad ways.
I don't need a doctor or a point, I don't need a justice of the peace -- I never turn to him or turn to him.
Not only do I not need schools, but they're even bad, like I told you.
For me, the Earth's institutions are simply to pay 18 knots from the tithe, to go to the city, to sleep with the bedbugs, and to listen to all the crap and crap, and I'm not motivated by personal interest.
'Let me,' said Sergei Ivanovic, with a smile, 'the personal interest did not encourage us to work for the liberation of the peasants, but we did.
'No! --are getting hotter, interrupt Konstantin. 'The liberation of the peasants was different.
It was a personal interest.
I wanted to throw that yoke off myself, which put pressure on us, on all the good people.
But to be public, to talk about how many golds and how many pipes I need to spend in a town where I don't live; to be a jury and to judge the man who stole the ham, and to listen for six hours to all the nonsense that lawyers and prosecutors are talking about, and as the chairman asks my old man, Aleška the fool, "Do you, Mr. defendant, accept the fact that the ham has been stolen?" - "Are you okay?"
Konstantin Levin had already been distracted, representing the chairman and Aleška the fool; he felt that this was all coming to terms with the case.
But Koznyshev shrugged his shoulders.
'Well, what are you saying?'
'I just want to say that the rights that affect me... my interest will always be protected by all means; that when we, the students, have searched and read our letters to the gendarme, I am prepared to defend these rights, to defend my rights of education, my freedoms.
I understand the military commitment that is affecting the fate of my children, my brothers and myself; I am ready to discuss what concerns me; but to judge where to distribute 40,000 Earth's money, or Aleshu the fool to judge -- I do not understand and I cannot.
Konstantin Levin spoke as if he had torn through the dam of his words.
Sergei Ivanovic smiled.
'And tomorrow you will be suing: would it please you to be tried in an old criminal chamber?'
'I will not sue.
I'm not gonna stab anyone, and I don't need it.
Well!-- he continued, jumping back to something completely insane -- our institutions and all of this -- like the birches that we bumped into, like on a Trinity day, to make it look like a forest that grew up in Europe, and I can't really water and believe in those birches!
Koznyshev shrugged only with his shoulders, expressing this gesture astonishment as to where these birches now came from in their dispute, even though he immediately understood what his brother wanted to say.
'Let me see, this is not a matter to be considered,' he observed. But Konstantin Levin wanted to justify his lack of self - respect for the common good, and he continued.
'I think,' said Constantin, 'that no activity can be sustained,' if it has no basis in personal interest.
It is a common truth, philosophical,' he said, strongly repeating the word philosophical, as if to show that he too had the right, like everyone else, to speak of philosophy.
Koznyshev smiled again.
"And he's got some kind of philosophy there, too, to serve his inclinations," he thought.
'Well, leave it to philosophy,' he said. &quot; The main objective of the philosophy of all centuries is precisely to find the necessary link that exists between personal interest and common interest.
But that's not the point, but the point is, I just need to correct your comparison.
Berezels aren't caught, but they're planted, they're planted, and they need to be treated more carefully.
Only those peoples have a future, only those who have a sense of and value for what is important and significant in their institutions.
And Koznyshev moved the question to the area of philosophical-historical, not available to Constantin Levin, and showed him all the injustice of his view.
'As for the fact that you don't like it, I'm sorry -- it's our Russian laziness and barbarism, and I'm sure you have a temporary error, and it will pass.'
Constantin didn't say a word.
He felt broken from all sides, but felt that what he wanted to say was not understood by his brother. All he didn't know was why it wasn't understood, because he couldn't tell what he wanted, because his brother didn't want to, or because he couldn't understand him.
But he did not delude himself into these thoughts, and he did not object to his brother, thinking about a completely different, personal matter. 'Well, let's go, though.
Koznyshev wrapped his last rod, Konstantin untied his horse, and they went.
Levin's personal case during his conversation with his brother was as follows: Last year, when he came to the door and was angry with the commander, Levin used his means of calm, he took the man's hair and began to cut.
He liked the work so much that he had to mow a number of times; he mowed out all the meadows in front of the house; and this year, from the spring, he had a plan -- to cut with the men for days.
Since his brother's arrival, he's been wondering if he's got a hair or not?
He was ashamed to leave his brother alone all day long, and he feared that the brother would not laugh at him for it.
But when he walked through the meadow, remembering the impressions of the crutch, he almost decided he was gonna mow.
After an annoying conversation with his brother, he remembered that purpose again.
"It's a physical move, or my character is going to go down," he thought, and decided to touch, as embarrassing as it would be in front of his brother and people.
Since the evening, Konstantin Levin has gone to the office, ordered the work, and sent the villages to call for kosses for tomorrow in order to mow the Kalin Meadow, the largest and best.
'Oh, send my braid, please, to Titus, that he may take it back and take it out tomorrow; perhaps I will cut myself, too,' he said, trying not to be confused.
The orderman smiled and said,
'I'm listening.'
Levin said to his brother for tea tonight.
'I think the weather is set,' he said. 'Tomorrow I start mowing.
'I love this job very much,' said Koznyshev.
'I love you terribly.
I've done it myself sometimes with men, and I want to do it all day tomorrow.
Koznyshev raised his head and looked curiously at his brother. 'What do you mean?
Like men all day?
'Yes, it is very pleasant,' said Levin.
'It's as beautiful as a physical exercise, but you can hardly stand it,' said Sergei Ivanovic without any ridicule.
'I have tried.
It's hard first, then you get involved.
I think I'm gonna...
'That's it!
But tell me, how do men look at it?
They must be laughing that the barn is freaking out.
'No, I don't think so; but it is so together and fun and hard work that there is no time to think.'
'But how will you eat with them?
It's embarrassing to send you a lafit and a turkey fried.
'No, I'll only come home one time with their rest.'
The next morning, Konstantin Levin got up earlier than usual, but his economic orders delayed him, and when he came to the elbow, the kosses were walking in the second row.
And the mountain opened to him, under the mountain, a shaded part of the meadow, with gray rows and black piles of kaftans removed by the kosses at the place from which they entered the first row.
As he drove up, he was opened up by a line that was stretched out, and different men waving their hairs, who were in the kaftans, who were in the same shirts.
He counted them forty-two.
They moved slowly on the uneven bottom of the meadow, where there was an old meadow.
Some of them were recognized by Levin.
There was an old man, Ermil, in a very long white shirt, bent down with a waving sauce; there was a young boy, Vashka, who was at Levin's dormitories, who took each row in a row. There was Tith, in the middle of Levin's uncle, a skinny little man.
Levin cried from the horse, and tied her to the road, and met with Titus, who delivered the second steed out of the bush, and delivered it.
'Ready, my lord; shaves, shaves himself,' said Titus, with a smile, taking off his hat and giving him a braid.
Levin took the cut and began to try it on.
Ended rows, sweaty and merry paws went out one by one to the road and laughed and said hello to the barin.
They all looked at him, but no one said anything until a high old man on the road with a shrivelled and beardless face, wearing a sheep jacket, turned to him.
'Look, my lord, I've got the goose, I've got to keep up! 'He said, and Levin heard a discreet laugh between the kosses.'
'I will try not to lag behind,' he said, after Titus and waiting for time to begin.
'Move it,' the old man repeated.
Titus set the place free, and Levin followed him.
The grass was low, the roadway, and Levin, long gone and embarrassed by his self - looking eyes, poked badly in the first minutes, even though he waved heavily.
He heard voices behind him:
'It's wrong, the handle is high, you see, he's bent like,' said one.
'Put more on the heel,' said the other.
'Nothing, all right, it's getting hot,' continued the old man. 'You see, go...
You're taking a wide row, you're freaking out... master, you can't, you're trying for yourself!
You know, it's a contract!
That's what our hump brother used to do.
The grass went softer, and Levin followed Titus, listening but not answering and trying to make the best of herbing.
They've gone a hundred steps. Titus kept walking without stopping, not showing the slightest fatigue: but Levin was already afraid that he would not endure: thus he was tired.
He felt that he was out of control, and he decided to ask Titus to stop.
But at the same time, Titus himself stopped and, leaning down, took herbs, oats, and began to sharpen.
Levin killed himself and took a breath and looked back.
A man was walking behind him and apparently also tired, because now, without Levin's arrival, he stopped and began to sharpen.
Titus soaked his bosom and Levin's, and they went on.
It was the same at the second reception.
Titus swerved behind the swing without stopping or tired.
Levin followed him, trying to keep up, and he became more and more difficult: a moment came when he felt that he was no longer able, but at the same time Titus stopped and sharpened.
That's how they got through the front row.
And this long row seemed particularly difficult to Levin; but at the same time, when the row was made to pass and Titus, when he was squeezing his elbow on his shoulder, he took slow steps to follow the tracks left by his heels on the leopard, and Levin walked in the same way on his leopard, even though the sweat was plowing down his face and dripping from his nose and all his back was moist like he was soaked in water, he was very well.
He was particularly pleased that he now knew what he could endure.
His pleasure was only poisoned by the fact that his row was not good.
"I'm gonna wave less with my hand, more with my whole torso," he thought, comparing the thread of Titus's cut-up row to his punctured and unevenly lying next to him.
The first row, as Levin observed, Titus walked especially quickly, probably wanting to try the barn, and the row was caught long.
The following rows were already easier, but Levin must have worked hard to keep up with the men.
He didn't think anything, he didn't want anything but to keep up with the men and do the best he could.
He heard only the lashes of the elbow, and saw before him the distant straight figure of Titus, the folded semicircle of the leopard, the slow and swirling herbs and the heads of the flowers, near the blade of his elbow, and the end of the row before him, which would have a resting place.
Without understanding what it was or where it came from, in the middle of his work, he suddenly experienced a pleasant feeling of cold over hot sweaty shoulders.
He looked at the sky while he was poking his hair.
There came a low, heavy cloud, and it rained heavily.
Some men went to the kaftans, and put them on: others, just as Levin did, did not shake their shoulders with joy under pleasant refreshingness.
There's another row.
Long, short, good, bad grassy rows passed through.
Levin lost all consciousness of the time and was determined not to know whether it was late or early.
His work is now undergoing a change that has brought him great pleasure.
In the middle of his work, he found moments in which he forgot what he was doing, and at that very moment, he was walking out almost as roven and good as Titus.
But he just remembered what he was doing, and he started trying to do better, and he immediately felt the weight of his work, and a row of people came out stupid.
After another row, he wanted to come in again, but Titus stopped and came to the old man and said something quietly to him.
They both looked at the sun. "What are they talking about, and why doesn't he come in the row?" 'I thought Levin, without realizing that the men had not stopped mosing for at least four hours, and it was time for them to have breakfast.'
'To breakfast, my lord,' said the old man.
'Is it time?
Well, breakfast.
Levin gave the braid to Titus and to the men who went to the caftans for bread, through a slightly splashed rain of the long pruning row of space, he went to the horse.
The only thing he realized was that the weather wasn't right and that the rain was pissing his hay.
'It will ruin the hay,' he said.
'Nothing, my lord, in the rain of the braids, in the weather of the rows!' said the old man.
Levin untied the horse and went home for coffee.
Sergei Ivanovic just got up. After drinking coffee, Levin went back to the floor before Sergei Ivanovic was able to get dressed and go out to the dining room.
After breakfast, Levin was no longer in his place, but between an old joker who invited him to his roommates and a young man who had only been married in the autumn and who had gone for the first summer.
The old man, standing straight ahead, walking straight and wide, moving his folded legs around, and the exact and smooth movement that did not seem to be worth him more labor than the manoeuvring hand on the walk, as if playing, postponed the same, tall row. It wasn't him, it was one spicy goat that shoved it on her own.
There was a young Mischka walking behind Levin.
The lovely young face of his, tied in his hair with a harness of fresh grass, all worked with effort; but as soon as they looked at him, he smiled.
He must have been willing to die sooner than admit that it was difficult for him.
Levin walked between them.
It wasn't so hard for him in the heat of the crutch.
His sweat cooled him down, and the sun, the scalding back, the head, and his elbow, gave him strength and tenacity in his work; and more often and more, the moments of unconsciousness came when it was possible not to think about what you were doing.
Kosa cut herself.
It was a happy moment.
Even more joyous were the moments when, as he approached the river in which the rows lay, the old man was rubbing wet grass on his sauce, stripping its steel in the fresh water of the river, rinding the bar and buying Levin.
'Oh, my kvasca!
Oh, that's good? 'He said, winking.'
Indeed, Levin never drank such a drink as this warm water with floating green and rusty taste from a tin braid.
And immediately afterwards, there came a blissful slow walk with a hand on the side of the stake, during which it was possible to wipe out the sweating sweat, to breathe full breasts, and to look around the stretch of the elbows and what was being done around, in the woods and in the field.
The more Levin coughed, the more and more he felt the minutes of forgetting when his hands were no longer waving, but when the goat itself moved the whole body that was conscious of itself, full of life, and, as if magically, without the thought of it, the work was doing the right and clear of itself.
Those were the happiest moments ever.
It was hard only when you had to stop making this unconscious move and think when you had to poach a pebble or an incredible pussy.
The old man did it easy.
The cat came, he changed the movement, and where he had his heel, where the end of the ponytails was stabbing the kitten on both sides with short blows.
And when he did so, he considered all things, and watched what was opened before him, that he would rip off the keg, eat it, or buy Levin; that he would throw away the braids with his sock; that he would look around the nest of the quail, from which the female flew out from under the cospit, and catch the goat that was in the way; and as he lifted it up with a fork, he showed Levin and cast it away.
And Levin and the young man behind him, these changes of movement were difficult.
They were both at work and unable to change the movement and at the same time observe what was in front of them.
Levin did not notice the timing.
If he had been asked how much time he had spent, he would have said that half an hour -- and the time had come for lunch.
On entering the row, the old man drew Levin's attention to girls and boys who, on various sides, were slightly visible, on the high grass and on the way to the kosses, carrying their hands with the knots of bread and wrapped up with rags with quails.
'You see, the goats are crawling!' he said, pointing to them, and looked under his hand at the sun.
Two more rows went through, the old man stopped.
'Well, my lord, eat lunch!' he said with determination.
And when they reached the river, they went through the rows to the kaftans, where the children, who had brought food, sat in wait for them.
The men gathered, far under the carts, and the fellows under the crustite bush on which the herbs were put.
Levin came to them; he did not want to leave.
Any shyness in front of the barn has long since disappeared.
Guys were getting ready for lunch.
Some were washing, young guys were swimming in the river, others were setting up a place to rest, unpacking bread bags, and sticking jugs with rugs.
The old man poured bread into a cup of bread, crushed it with a stalk of spoons, poured water out of the tarp, cut the bread, and put salt on it, and prayed eastward.
'Well, my lord, my prison,' he said, kneeling in front of a cup.
The prison was so delicious that Levin thought of going home for lunch.
He had lunch with the old man and spoke to him about his domestic affairs, taking part in them alive, and informed him of all his cases and of all the circumstances that the old man might have been interested in.
He felt closer to him than to his brother, and he smiled willingly at the tenderness that he felt for him. When the old man stood up again, prayed, and lay right under the bush, laying under the head of the grass, Levin did the same, and, despite sticky, sticky flies and goats tickling his sweaty face and body, he fell asleep immediately and woke up only when the sun set on the other side of the bush and took it out.
The old man hasn't slept in a while, and he's been smacking up young guys' braids.
Levin looked around him, and did not know the place: so things changed.
The vast area of the meadow was cut and glittered with a special, new glitter, with its already smelling rows, in evening scalp rays of the sun.
And the shrubs of the river, and the river itself, which had not been seen before, and now the shiny steel in its wieners, and the moving and rising people, and the steep wall of the grass of the meadow, and the hawk, which was hanging over the naked meadow, were all brand-new.
When Levin woke up, he realized how much had been cut, how much more could be done today.
It worked extremely well for forty-two people.
All the big meadows that had been coughed up for two days with a barch in the thirty-shoes had already been cut. Corners with short rows remained unscathed.
But Levin wanted to cut down as much as possible on this day, and it was a shame in the sun, which was coming down so soon.
He felt no fatigue; he only wanted more and more quickly and as much as possible.
'What do you think we're gonna do, Maskin Verkh?' He said to the old man.
'God willing, the sun is not high.
Some water for the guys?
During the afternoon, when they sat down and smoked again, the old man announced to the guys that "Maskin Upstairs is gonna be a vodka."
'Eka, don't cut it!
Come on in, Titus!
Let's get out of here!
You eat at night.
Come in! 'The voices were heard, and when they had eaten the bread they went in.
'Well, guys, hang on!' said Titus, and almost went in front of him.
'Go, go!' said the old man, singing after him and easily catching up with him, 'I will cut him off!
Look out!
And the young and the old, they were kind of sneaking around.
But as they hastened, they did not destroy the grass, and the rows were set aside as clean and clear.
The corner left in the corner was blown away in five minutes. More recent cosmos came in rows as the front side seized the kaftans on its shoulders and went across the road to Maskin Upper.
The sun was already coming down to the trees when they entered the woods of Maskin Upper.
The grass was in the belt in the middle of the holster, and soft and soft, poofy, somewhere in the woods, was groaning by the Ivan da maria.
After a short meeting -- whether to walk or to cross -- Prohor Ermilin, also a famous koss, a huge black man, went in front.
He walked forward, turned back and backslided, and everyone began to straighten out after him, walking under the mountain on the crowbar and on the mountain beneath the very cannon of the forest. The sun set behind the woods.
Rosa had already fallen, and the cosmos were only on the mountain in the sun, and at the bottom of which the steam was rising, and on the other side they walked in a fresh, shiny shadow.
Work's boiling.
Cut with juicy sound and spicy smelling grass lay in high rows.
And the groaning on the short rows of the braids from all sides, and the whistle of the whistle on the braid, and the jolly screaming.
Levin was still walking between a young man and an old man.
The old man who wore his sheep jacket was just as fun, joking, and free to move.
In the woods, birch mushrooms were constantly bred in the mushrooms, which were cut with braids.
But the old man, when he met the mushroom, every time he bent, picked up and put it in his bosom. "An old hotel," he condemned.
As easy as it was to mow wet and weak grass, it was difficult to go down and climb the steep coshoes of the ravine.
But the old man wasn't shy-- got it.
While he was still a braid, he was a small, hard step in his big legs, climbing slowly and shaking the whole body and hanging under his shirt with his helmets, not missing a single herb, not a single mushroom, and also joking with men and Levin.
Levin followed him, and often thought that he would surely fall, climbing such a steep bog, where it would be difficult to climb without a braid; but he climbed and did what was right.
He felt that some outside force was moving them.
Maskin Verkh was mowed down, finished with the last rows, put on the kaftans, and went to the house funny.
Levin sat down on the horse and went home with regret to say goodbye to the men.
And he looked down from the mountain, and they were not seen in the mist that came up from the bottom; and none could hear except the merry, bitter voices, and the groaning, and the sound of the groaning.
Koznyshev had lunch and drank water with lemon and ice in his room a long time ago, looking at the newspapers and magazines just received from the post office when Levin, with sweaty-toe hair and black hair, wet back and breasts, broke into his room with a fun talk.
'And we worked the whole meadow!
Oh, it's so good, it's amazing!
How did you live? 'Said Levin, completely forgetting yesterday's unpleasant conversation.
'Fathers! 'What do you look like?' said Sergei Ivanovich, looking at his brother at the very first minute unsatisfied. 'Yes, but shut the door!' he cried. 'Indeed, he let in a dozen whole.'
Koznyshev hated flies and opened windows in his room only at night and carefully closed the doors.
'By God, none.
And if you let me in, I'll catch you.
You're not gonna believe what a pleasure it is!
How was your day?
'I'm good.
But you've been poking around all day, haven't you?
You're as hungry as a wolf, I think.
Kuzma made it all for you.
'No, I'm not hungry. I ate there.
I'm gonna go wash up.
'Well, go, go, and I will come to you now,' said Koznyshev, shaking his head, looking at his brother. 'Go quickly,' he added, smiling, and gathered his books and prepared to go. He suddenly had fun and didn't want to break up with his brother. 'Well, during the rain, where were you?
'What rain?
A little sneaky.
So I'll be right there.
So you had a good day?
Well, that's great. 'And Levin went off to get dressed.'
Five minutes later, the brothers got together in the dining room.
Although Levin felt that he did not want to eat, he sat down for lunch only to avoid hurting Kuzma, but when he began eating, he found his lunch extremely tasty.
Koznyshev, smiling, looked at him.
'Yes, you have a letter,' he said. 'Kuzma, bring it from the bottom, please.
Look at the door.
The letter was from Oblonski.
Levin read it out loud.
Oblonsky wrote from Petersburg: "I got a letter from Dolly, she's in Ergushov, and she's not doing well.
Please go see her, help her with the advice, you know everything.
She'll be so happy to see you. She's all alone, poor girl.
A mother-in-law with everyone else abroad."
'That's great!
'I will certainly go to them,' said Levin. 'Cause we'll go together.
She's so nice.
Isn't that right?
'Are they not far from here?'
'Certain thirty. I think it's gonna be 40.
But it's a great road. We'll have a great trip.
'It is very good,' said Koznyshev, smiling all.
The look of the little brother had him directly for fun.
'Well, you have an appetite! 'He said, looking at his leaning face and neck above a plate of brown-red-tanned faces.'
'Great!
You're not gonna believe how useful this regime is against any bullshit.
I want to enrich medicine with a new term: Arbeitscur.
'Well, you don't need it, I think.'
'Yes, but different nervous patients.
'Yes, it must be tested.
And I was gonna come over to look at you, but the heat was so intense, I didn't go beyond the woods.
I sat in the woods and went on a slut, met your feeder, and dreamt of a man's look at you.
I understand they don't approve.
She said, "It's not God's business."
In general, it seems to me that the concept of popular is very firm in defining the requirements for what they call the "gospod" activity. And they won't let the gentlemen out of their bounds.
'Maybe; but it is a pleasure that I have never felt in my life.
There's nothing wrong with that.
Isn't that right? 'Saying to Levin.' 'What if they don't like it?'
Anyway, I think it's okay.
'In fact,' Koznyshev continued,' I see you are pleased with your day.
'Very pleased.
We cut off all the meadows.
And what an old man I've been friends with!
You can't imagine what a beauty it is!
Me too. First, I have solved two chess problems, and one is very nice, &quot; opened with a pawn.
I'll show you.
And then I thought about our conversation yesterday.
'What? About yesterday's conversation? 'Said Levin, blissfully squeezing and blowing away after the end of the meal, and determinedly unable to recall what it was like yesterday's conversation.
'I'll make sure you're right in part.
Our disagreement is that you drive a personal interest, and I believe that the interest of the common good should be in every person at a certain level of education.
Maybe you're right, which would be more desirable if you were interested in material activity. Actually, you're too preme-sautiere, as the French say; you want passion, energy or nothing.
Levin listened to his brother and was determined to understand nothing and did not want to understand it.
He was only afraid that his brother would ask him a question that would show that he had heard nothing.
'That's right, my friend,' said Koznyshev, touching his shoulder.
'Yes, of course.
Oh, come on!
'I do not stand for my own,' answered Levin with a child, a guilty smile.
"What was I arguing about? 'He thought.' 'Of course, and I am right, and he is right, and everything is fine.
All you have to do is go to the office."
He stood up, stretching and smiling.
Koznyshev smiled, too.
'You want to walk, let's go together,' he said, not wanting to break up with his brother, from whom freshness and awakeness had shown you. 'Come on, let's go to the office if you need it.'
'Oh, Fathers! 'Screamed Levin so loudly that Koznyshev was afraid.'
'What, what are you?'
'What's Agatha Mikhaylovna's hand? 'Said Levin, hitting himself on the head.' 'I forgot about her.
'A lot better.
'Well, I will run to her.
You don't have time to put your hat on, I'll be back.
And he's like a cracker and he's got heels running down the stairs.
While Stepan Arkadič came to Petersburg to perform the most natural, known to all employees, although it was not clear to the laymen, the most necessary duty without which there was no opportunity to serve -- to remind herself at the Ministry -- and in carrying out that duty, taking almost all the money out of the house, had had fun and pleasant time, both at the races and at the dormitories, Dolly and her children moved to the village to reduce the cost.
She moved to her dowry, the village of Jergushovo, where the woods were sold in the spring and which was 50 versts from Pokrovsky Levin.
In Jergushov, a large old house was broken a long time ago, and the prince was removed and enlarged.
Twenty years ago, when Dolly was a kid, he was fit and comfortable, even though he stood like all the fligels, side by side to the exit alley and south.
But now it was old and rotten.
When Stepan Arkadić also drove in the spring to sell the woods, Dolly asked him to wash the house and tell him to fix it.
Stepan Arkadić, like all the guilty husbands who took great care of his wife's comforts, searched the house himself and ordered everything he saw fit.
As he understood it, he had to break all the furniture, hang the gardens, clear the garden, make a bridge by the pond, and plant the flowers; but he forgot many other things that were needed, the lack of which he then tortured Daria Alexandrovna.
As much as Stepan Arkadič tried to be a caring father and husband, he could not remember that he had a wife and children.
He had blank tastes, only he could handle them.
When he returned to Moscow, he proudly announced to his wife that everything was prepared, that the house would be a toy, and that he advised her to go.
Stepan Arkadiyich's departure to the village was very pleasant in all respects: both children are fine and less expensive, and he is freer.
Daria Alexandrovna, on the other hand, considered moving to the village for the summer to be necessary for the children, especially for the girl who could not recover after the Scarlatine, and finally to get rid of the small humiliations, the small debts to the woodwork, the fish, the shoes that tormented her.
On top of that, she was pleased to leave because she wanted to take her sister Kitty to her village, who was to return from abroad in mid-summer, and was required to bathe.
Kitty wrote from the waters that nothing smiles as much as spending the summer with Dolly in Ergushov, full of childhood memories for both of them.
The early days of village life were very difficult for Dolly.
She lived in the village as a child, and she had the impression that the village was saved from all the city's troubles, that life there was not beautiful, but it was cheap and comfortable: everything was there, everything was cheap, everything was possible, and the children were fine.
But now, when the mistress came to the village, she saw that it wasn't what she thought it was.
On the other day, it rained heavily upon their arrival, and at night it fell in the hallway and in the nursery, so the beds were moved to the living room.
There were no cooks; of the nine cows, some were found to be cattle, some toys, others to be the first calf, others to be old, and others to be the fourth Tugosisi; neither butter nor milk, even to children, was lacking.
There were no eggs.
Chicken could not be obtained; old, purple, cocks were roasted and boiled.
You couldn't get the women to wash the floors -- everybody was on potatoes.
You couldn't ride 'cause one horse was jamming and ripping in.
There was nowhere to go; the whole riverside was trampled by cattle and opened from the road; even walking could not be allowed, because the bastard entered the garden through a broken fence, and there was one scary bull that reeled and therefore must have been afraid.
There were no dress closets. As they were, they didn't close, and they opened themselves when they passed by them.
There were no irons or shorts; there was no laundromat or even a ironboard for the maiden.
For the first time, instead of being calm and resting, when she saw these terrible disasters, she was desperate: she worked hard, felt desperate, and held back tears from her eyes every minute.
The manager, a former wachmist, whom Stepan Arkadych loved and identified from the doormen for his beautiful and respectful appearance, did not take any part in the disasters of Daria Alexandrovna, respectfully said, "Nothing is possible, such a bad people," and did not help in anything.
The situation seemed hopeless. But in the house of Oblonski, as in all the family houses, there was one invisible but most important and useful face -- Matrena Philmononna.
She calmed the lady, assured her that everything would be formed (it was her word, and Matway took it from her), and she acted without rushing or worrying.
She immediately got in touch with the concubine, and on the first day she drank with her and the orderman tea under the acacia and discussed all the cases.
The Matrena Philimonna Club was soon established under the acacias, and then, through this club, which was made up of concubines, chiefs, and clerks, the difficulties of life began to equalize a little bit, and after a week it was really all formed.
The roof was repaired, the cook, the cuisine was taken out, the chickens were bought, the milk was taken out, and the woods were sealed with sticks, the carpentry was made to the cupboards, the hooks were placed to the cupboards, and the iron board, wrapped in a soldier's scum, lay from the hand of the chair on the drawer, and smelled of the girl's iron.
'There you go! And you were desperate,' said Matrena Philmononna, pointing to the board.
They even built a bathing suit from straw shields.
Lily started swimming, and some of her expectations, though not a calm but convenient village life, were fulfilled for Darya Alexandrovna.
I couldn't be calm with the six children of Daria Alexandrovna. One was ill, the other could be ill, the third was missing something, the fourth showed signs of a bad character, etc., etc.
It is rare that short periods of calm have rarely been given.
But these troubles and anxietys were the only possible happiness for Daria Alexandrovna.
If she hadn't, she would have stayed alone with her thoughts about a husband who didn't love her.
But also, no matter how hard it was for the mother to be afraid of disease, the disease and the grief in view of the signs of bad inclinations in the children, the children themselves have paid her now with little joy for her grief.
The joys were so small that they were as invisible as gold in the sand, and at bad times she saw only sorrows, one sand; but there were good moments when she saw only joy, one gold.
Now, in the solitude of the village, she has become more and more aware of these joys...
Often, when she looked at them, she made every effort to convince herself that she was mistaken, that she was as a mother partial to her children; yet she could not help but tell herself that she had beautiful children, all six, all in different births, but those that rarely existed -- and she was happy and proud of them.
At the end of May, when she had become more or less comfortable, she had received her husband &apos; s reply to her complaints about the lack of village facilities.
He wrote to her, saying he was sorry that he hadn't thought it through, and he promised to come at the earliest opportunity.
This opportunity did not arise and, until early June, Daria Alexandrovna lived alone in the village.
Petrovkovki, on Sunday, Daria Alexandrovna travelled to the poverty line to include all her children.
Daria Alexandrovna, in her heartfelt, philosophical conversations with her sister, mother, and friends, often surprised them with her free will about religion.
She had a strange religion of methmpsychosis, which she firmly believed in, with little concern for the dogmas of the church.
But in the family, she -- not just to set an example, but from the bottom of her heart -- had strictly complied with all the church requirements, and the fact that the children had not been to the communion for about a year was of great concern to her, and, with the full approval and sympathy of Matrena Philmonna, she decided to do so now in the summer.
Daria Alexandrovna thought a few days ahead of how to dress all the children.
Dressings were sewn, rewrapped and washed, scarring and shrubs were released, buttons were sewn and ribbons were prepared.
One dress on Tanya, which had to sew an English woman, ruined a lot of Daria Alexandrovna's blood.
An English woman was embroidered, embroidered in the wrong place, took out her sleeves and completely ruined the dress.
Tane grabbed his shoulders so it hurt to see. But Matrena Filimonna figured out how to insert a blade and make a pelerin.
The case went well, but there was almost a fight with an English woman.
In the morning, however, everything was settled, and by nine o &apos; clock -- the time when the father was asked to wait with the poor -- radiant, dressed children stood by the porch in front of the porch, waiting for the mother.
In the wheelchair, instead of the raven, the raven was trapped, in the protection of Matrena Philimonna, the commander of Burogo, and Darya Alexandrovna, who had been detained for her toilet, dressed in a white soy dress, went out to sit down.
Daria Alexandrovna scrubbed and dressed with care and excitement.
She used to dress for herself in order to be beautiful and to like her; then the more she grew old, the more unpleasant she began to dress, and she saw her foolishness. But now she's dressed with pleasure and excitement again.
Now she didn't dress for herself, not for her beauty, but for her, as a mother of these adorables, to ruin the general impression.
And the last time she looked in the mirror, she was happy with herself.
She was good. Not as good as she used to want to be at the ball, but good for the purpose she now meant.
There was no one in the church but men and janitors and their women. But she saw, or thought she saw, the admiration of her children and her.
Not only were the children beautiful themselves in their dresses, but they were nice in how well they held themselves together.
Alesha really wasn't very well: he turned around and wanted to see his jacket behind him; but he was really nice.
Tanya stood like a big one and watched the little ones.
But the lesser Lily was adorable with her naive surprise in front of everyone, and it was hard not to smile when, when she was involved, she said, "Please, some more."
When the children returned home, they felt something solemn had happened, and they were very humble.
Everything was going well at home; but after breakfast, Grish started whistling and, worst of all, disobeyed the English and was left without a sweet pie.
Daria Alexandrovna wouldn't let this day go to punishment if she was here; but she had to support the English woman's order, and she confirmed her decision that Grisha wouldn't have a sweet pie.
It ruined a bit of the general joy.
Grisha cried, saying that Nicolenka had whistled, but that he had not been punished and that he was not crying from a pie -- he didn't care -- but that he was unjust.
It was too sad, and Daria Alexandrovna decided to talk to an English woman and forgive Grisha and go to her.
But when she passed through the hall, she saw a scene filled with such joy in her heart that tears appeared to her, and she forgave the perpetrator herself.
The one who was punished sat in the room on the corner window, and Tanya stood beside him with a plate.
As if she wanted a doll dinner, she asked the English woman to take her pie to the nursery and instead brought it to her brother.
While he was crying about the injustice of his punishment, he ate the pie he brought, and he said, "Eat yourself, we'll eat together... together."
At first, Tania felt sorry for Grisha, then conscious of her virtuous conduct, and her tears were also in her eyes; but she did not refuse to eat her share.
When they saw their mother, they were scared, but when they looked at her face, they realized that they were doing good, laughed, and with full cake, they began to wipe their lips with their smiling hands, and they covered all their radiant faces with tears and jam.
'Mothers!Hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey.
New white dress!
Tanya!
Grisha! 'Said the mother, trying to save the dress, but with tears in her eyes, smiling with a blessed, joyful smile.'
The new dresses were removed, the girls were told to wear blouses, and the boys were told to put on a line -- again, to disappoint the commander, Burgo in the air -- to go for mushrooms and bathing.
The groaning groaned up into the nursery and didn't stop until he left for the bathing suit.
The mushroom was filled with a basket, even Lily found a berze mushroom.
Miss Ghul used to find and show her, but now she's found a big birch whore, and there's a general excited cry, "Lily found a whore!"
Then they drove up to the river, put the horses under the birches, and went to the bathing suit.
Coach Terentius, tied to a tree waving his horses, lay down, herbs, in the shadow of the birch, and smoked tutuuns, while from the bathing suit to the-- there was a squeezing of a child's hilarious scream before him.
Although it was difficult to watch and stop all the children's pranks, it was difficult to remember and not to confuse all those stockings, pantalons, boots from different legs and unbutton, unbutton and tie the tags and buttons, Daria Alexandrovna, who herself had always loved a bathing suit, who considered it useful for the children, did not enjoy anything as much as this bathing with all the children.
Picking up all these puffy legs, pulling stockings on them, grabbing and drooling those naked calfs and hearing those joyous and scared screams; seeing these suffocating, open, frightened and funny faces, these splashing little ones of their own, was a great pleasure for her.
When half of the children were already dressed, the bathing suit came and was shyly stopped by the women who were walking behind the snout and the milkman.
Matrena Philiponna clicked one to let her dry the water-dropped sheet and shirt, and Daria Alexandrovna spoke to the women.
The women, who had initially laughed in their hand and did not understand the question, soon dared and talked, immediately bribing Daria Alexandrovna with the sincere love they showed.
'You look beautiful, white as sugar,' said one, staring at Taneku and shaking her head. 'And the thin one...'
'Yes, she was sick.
'You see, you were bathing, too,' said the other on the breast.
'No, he's only three months old,' replied with the pride of Daria Alexandrovna.
'Here you are!
'And you have children?
'There were four, two left: a boy and a girl.
That's what I took from the past.
'How old is she?
'It's another year.
'What took you so long to feed?
'Our custom: three posts...'
And the conversation became the most interesting for Daria Alexandrovna: How did she give birth? What's wrong with being sick? Where's the husband? How often does it happen?
Daria Alexandrovna didn't want to leave the women, she was so interested in talking to them, so they had the same interests.
The most pleasant thing about her was that she clearly saw how many of these women admired her children and how good they were.
The women made a mockery of Darius Alexandrovna and hurt the English woman because she was the cause of this strange laugh.
One of the young women looked at an English woman dressed after all, and when she wore a third skirt, she couldn't help but say, "You've been spinning, spinning, doing nothing!" 'She said, and everyone laughed.'
Surrounded by all the ransomed, wet heads, children, and Darya Alexandrovna, with a handkerchief on her head, she was on her way to the house when the coachman said,
'The Barin seems to be walking in a tavern, and Daria Alexandrovna looked forward and rejoiced when she saw in a gray hat and a gray coat of a familiar figure of Levin coming towards them.
She's always been happy with him, but now she's especially happy that he sees her in all her glory.
No one better than Levin could understand her greatness.
When he saw her, he found himself in front of one of his imaginary future family lives.
'You are certainly the heir, Daria Alexandrovna.
'Ah, I am so glad!' she said, reaching out her hand to him.
'It's good to know, not to know.'
My brother lives.
I got a note from Steve that you're here.
'From Steve? 'I was surprised to ask Darya Alexandrovna.'
'Yes, he writes that you've moved, and thinks you'll let me help you with something,' said Levin, and said it, suddenly he was embarrassed and, having interrupted his speech, continued silently to walk by the ruler, tearing apart the fake runners and eating them.
He was embarrassed by the assumption that Daria Alexandrovna would be unhappy with the help of an outsider in the matter to be done by her husband.
Daria Alexandrovna really didn't like that stepan Arkadyich way of imposing his family's affairs on strangers. And she immediately realized that Levin understood that.
For this subtleness of understanding, for this delicateness, she loved Levin Daria Alexandrovna.
'I realized, of course,' said Levin, 'that it only means that you want to see me, and it is very happy.'
Of course, I imagine you, the city mistress, are wild here, and if you need anything, I'm all yours.
'Oh, no! 'Yes,' said Dolly. 'The first time was uncomfortable, and now everything is well arranged thanks to my old nanny,' she said, pointing to Matrena Philemononna, who understood what was being said about her, and had a fun and friendly smile for Levin.
She knew him and knew he was a good bridegroom, and she wanted things to work out.
'Let's sit down, we'll bend over here,' she said to him.
'No, I'll walk.
Kids, who's gonna race horses with me?
The children knew Levin very little, did not remember when they saw him, but did not show him the strange sense of shyness and disgust that children so often experience towards adult pretending people and for which they are so often and painfully hurt.
Pretending in anything can deceive the smartest, most discerning man; but the most limited child, however skilledly hidden, recognizes him and turns away.
No matter how flawed Levin was, there was no sign in him, so the children showed him the kind of friendship they found on their mother's face.
At his invitation, the two elders immediately went to him and ran with him as easily as they would run with the nanny, Miss Ghul, or the mother.
Lily prayed to him, too, and his mother gave it to him; he put it on his shoulder, and ran with her.
'Don't be afraid, don't be afraid, Daria Alexandrovna! 'He said, laughing at my mother,' he said, 'it is impossible for me to hurt or drop.'
And looking at his witty, strong, careful, and over-stressed movements, his mother calmed down and laughed and smiled at him with pleasure.
Here in the village, with the children and with the kindness of him, Daria Alexandrovna, Levin came to the one who often found him to be a childlike, funny spirit that Darwina especially loved in him.
Running with the children, he taught them gymnastics, made Miss Ghul laugh with his bad English language, and told Daria Alexandrovna his lessons in the village.
After lunch, Daria Alexandrovna, sitting alone with him on the balcony, spoke of Kitty.
'Do you know? Kitty will come here and spend the summer with me.
'Right? 'He said, when he had broken out, and immediately, to change the conversation, he said, 'So send you two cows?'
If you want to count, pay me five rubles a month if you're not ashamed.
'No, thank you.'
We're all set up.
'Well, I will look at your cows, and if I may, I will order how to feed them.
It's all about the feed.
And Levin, just to distract the conversation, described to Daria Alexandrovna the theory of dairy farming, which is that the cow is only a machine to convert feed into milk, etc.
He said that, and he was eager to hear the details about Kitty, and he feared it together.
He was afraid that the calm he had so hard to gain would upset him.
'Yes, but you have to keep an eye on all this, but who will?' 'Darya Alexandrovna answered reluctantly.
So now she's set up her farm through Matrena Philemononna that she didn't want to change anything about it; nor did she believe Levin's knowledge of agriculture.
The argument that a cow was a milk machine was suspicious to her. She felt that this kind of reasoning could only interfere with the household.
She thought it was a lot easier to do than just give Pestroch and Belopaha more food and drink and make sure that the cook didn't take the garbage out of the laundry cow's kitchen.
That was clear.
And the discourse about flour and herbal food was questionable and unclear. The point is, she wanted to talk about Kitty...
'Kiti writes to me that she wants nothing more than privacy and calm,' said Dolly after the silence.
'Is her health better? 'Agitatedly asked Levin.'
'Thank God she's fully recovered.
I never believed she had breast disease.
'Ah, I am very pleased! 'Said Levin, and something touching, helpless seemed to Dolly in his face while he said it and looked at her silently.
'Listen, Konstantin Dmitrich,' said Daria Alexandrovna, smiling with her kind and a little laughing smile, 'why are you angry with Kitty?
I'm not angry,' said Levin.
'No, you're angry.
Why didn't you come to us or them when you were in Moscow?
'Daria Alexandrovna,' he said, blushing to the root of his hair, 'I am surprised that you, with your kindness, do not feel that way.
How do you-- don't feel sorry for me when you know...
'What do I know?
'You know that I proposed and that I was denied,' Levin said, and all the tenderness he felt for Kitty a minute ago was replaced in his heart by his anger for insult.
'Why do you think I know?'
'Because everyone knows it.'
'That's what you're wrong about; I didn't know it, even though I knew it.
'Ah! Well, now you know.
'I only knew that something had happened, that she had suffered terribly, and that she had asked me never to talk about it.
And if she didn't tell me, she wouldn't tell anyone.
But what did you have?
Tell me.
'I told you what happened.
'When?
'The last time I was with you.
'You know what I'll tell you,' said Daria Alexandrovna, 'and I feel awful, awful sorry for her.
You only suffer from pride...
'Maybe,' said Levin, 'but...
She interrupted him:
'But her poor thing, I feel awful and awful sorry for her.'
I get it now.
'Well, Daria Alexandrovna, forgive me,' he said, getting up. 'Goodbye!
Daria Alexandrovna, goodbye.
'No, wait,' she said, grabbing him by the sleeve. 'Wait, sit down.
'Please, please, let us not talk about it,' he said, sitting down, yet feeling that there was a hope in his heart that seemed to be buried.
'If I didn't love you,' said Daria Alexandrovna, and tears came to her eyes, 'if I didn't know you as I know you...
The feeling of the dead came to life more and more, lifted up and took possession of Levin's heart.
'Yes, I've come to understand now,' continued Daria Alexandrovna. 'You can't understand it; you men, free and chosen, are always clear who you love.
But a girl in a waiting position, with this woman's, girl's shame, a girl who sees you men from afar, takes your word -- a girl can and may feel like she doesn't know what to say.
'Yes, if the heart does not speak...'
'No, the heart says, but think: you men have views of a girl, you drive into the house, you get close, you look, you wait, you find what you love, and then, when you are convinced that you love, you propose...
'Well, that's not entirely true.
'Anyway, you propose when your love is ripe, or when you have a balance between the two chosen.'
And the girl isn't asked.
They want her to choose, and she can't choose, and she just answers: yes, she can't.
"Yeah, the choice between me and Wronski," Levin thought, and the dead man who lived in his soul died again, and only painfully pressed his heart.
'Daria Alexandrovna,' he said, 'it's the way to choose a dress, or I don't know what kind of purchase, not love...
The choice is made, and all the better... and there can be no repetition.
'Ah, pride and pride!' said Daria Alexandrovna, as if to despise him for the lowness of that feeling in comparison to the other feeling that some women know. 'As you proposed to Kitty, she was in a situation where she could not answer. There was a hesitation in her.
The oscillation is either you or Wronsky. 'She saw him every day. You haven't seen him in a while.
Let's say if she was older -- for me, for example, there could be no hesitation in her place.
He was always disgusting to me, and he ended up like that.
Levin remembered Kitty's answer.
She said, "No, it can't be...
'Daria Alexandrovna,' he said dry, 'I appreciate your trust in me; I think you're wrong.
But, whether I'm right or wrong, this pride that you despise so much makes it impossible for me to think of Katherina Alexandrovna -- you know, absolutely impossible.
'I'll just say one more thing: you understand that I'm talking about a sister that I love as my children.
I'm not saying that she loves you, but I just wanted to say that her refusal at that moment doesn't prove anything.
'I don't know! 'As he leaped up, Levin said.' 'If only you knew how much you hurt me!
Even as your child would die, and you would be told, "He would be like this, and he could live, and you would rejoice in him." And he's dead, he's dead, he's dead...
'How funny you are,' said Daria Alexandrova with a sad laugh, despite Levin's excitement. 'Yes, I understand more and more now,' she kept thinking. 'So you won't come to us when Kitty arrives?'
'No, I won't.
Of course, I will not avoid Katherina Alexandrovna, but where I can, I will try to save her from the trouble of my presence.
'You are very, very funny,' she repeated, looking tenderly at his face. 'Well, good, as if we hadn't said anything about it. Why are you here, Tanya? 'Daria Alexandrovna said in French to a girl who had entered.
'Where's my shovel, Mother?
'I speak French, and so do you.
The girl wanted to say, but she forgot how to use French; her mother told her and then in French told her where to find the shoulder.
And that seemed unpleasant to Levin.
Everything now seemed to him in the house of Daria Alexandrovna and in her children no longer as nice as it used to be.
"And why does she speak French to the children? I think he's thinking. 'How unnatural and false!
And the kids feel it.
'Learning French and learning from sincerity' he thought with himself, not knowing that Daria Alexandrovna had changed her mind twenty times, and yet, to the detriment of sincerity, he found it necessary to teach his children in this way.
'But where do you want to go?'
Sit down.
Levin stayed until tea, but his joy disappeared, and he was embarrassed.
After tea, he went out to the front to serve the horses, and when he returned, he found Daria Alexandrovna excited, upset with her face and tears in front of her eyes.
While Levin was leaving, there was an event for Darya Alexandrovna, which suddenly destroyed all her happiness and pride of the children today.
Grisha and Tanya fought for the ball.
Daria Alexandrovna, when she heard a scream in the nursery, ran out and caught them in a terrible state.
Tanya was holding Grisha by the hair, and he, with a disfigured evil face, punched her where he got to.
Something came out of Darya Alexandrovna's heart when she saw it.
It was as if the darkness had led to her life: she realized that the children she was so proud of were not only ordinary, but even bad, ill - mannered children, with gross, brutal inclinations, wicked children.
She could not speak or think of anything else, nor could she fail to tell Levin of her misfortune.
Levin saw that she was unhappy, and tried to comfort her, saying that it was not a bad thing to prove that all the children were fighting; but in saying it, in his heart Levin thought, "No, I will not break and speak French with my children, but I will not have such children: I must not spoil, nor have children, and they will be adorable.
Yeah, I'm not gonna have kids like that."
He said goodbye and left, and she didn't hold him back.
In half July, the chief of the sister village, twenty versts from Pokrovsky, appeared to Levin with a progress report and a cut.
The main income from the sister's estate was from the flood meadows.
In previous years, the shrubs were dealt with by men for 20 rubles per tithe.
When Levin took the name into control, he looked at the sheaths and found that they were worth more, and set a price for ten twenty-five rubles.
The men did not give the price and, as Levin suspected, beat the other buyers.
Then Levin went there himself, and ordered that the meadow be removed with a portion of the hire, part of the share.
By all means, men prevented this innovation, but the case went on, and in the first year, the meadow was almost doubled.
In the third and last year, the same men's opposition continued, and the cleaning was done in the same manner.
This year, the men took all the shrubs out of the third half, and now the chief came to announce that the shrubs had been removed and that he, fearing the rain, had invited the clerk to join him, and he had already separated and scrubbed eleven of the Lord's Stogs.
The undefined answers to the question of how much hay there was on the main meadow, the hurry of the chief who shared the hay without asking, all over the tone of the man Levin realized that there was something wrong with that part of the hay, and he decided to go to believe the case himself.
On arriving at lunch in the village and leaving a horse with an old friend, the husband of a brotherly nurse, Levin went into the old man's beekeeper, seeking details from him about the cleaning of the elbow.
A gentle old man, Parmenich, said, happily received Levin, showed him all his household, gave him all the details of his bees and the romance of this year; but Levin's questions about the carpet were vaguely and reluctantly spoken to him.
This was further affirmed by Levin in his suggestions.
He went to the couch and looked at the haystack. In the stogs there could not be fifty horses, and in order to convict the men, Levin told them to call the hay-driveers now, to lift up one stog, and to transport them to the barn.
Only thirty-two roads came out of the storm.
Despite the Chief's assurance about the chubbyness of the hay and how it settled in the stompers, and his God's that everything was in God's way, Levin insisted that the hay was shared without his command and that he therefore did not accept the hay for fifty moats in the hay.
After a long debate, the case was decided that the men would accept these eleven stegs, counting the 50 wons, for their share, and that they would be allocated again to God's share.
The negotiations continued until noon.
When the last hay was divided, Levin, in charge of the rest of the shopkeeper's supervision, sat on a punctured pickle of a cop, staring at the people's boiling meadows.
Before him, in the confluence of the river behind the marsh, ripping out the callable voices, the women's sandwich was moved, and from the trembling hay, the gray winding wails were quickly drawn out across the light green have.
The women were followed by men with wands, and the gross grew wide, tall, swollen cops.
On the left of the meadow that had already been removed, the carts grumbled, and one after another, served by the great navilins, the cops vanished, and the horses that hanged upon their butts were filled with heavy gardens of fermented hay.
'To get rid of the weather! There's gonna be hay! 'The old man who sat by Levin said.' 'Thai, not hay!
Exactly drowning the grain as it was picked up, and he added it to it, pointing to the punctured cops. 'They took half of the good stuff out of lunch.
'The last one, is it?' 'He cried at the small one, who, standing on the front of the cart and waved at the ends of the stumps, was passing by.'
'The last one, Father! 'Screaming at the young man, holding the horse, and smiling, looking back at the funny, also smiled at the rosy woman sitting in the cartcase,' and went on.
'Who is this?
Son? 'I asked Levin.'
'My little one,' said the old man with a sweet smile.
'Good for you!
'Nothing small.
'Am I married?'
'Yes, he went to Philipovka for the third year.
'Well, there are children, too?'
'What children!
For a whole year he understood nothing, and he was ashamed," the old man answered. 'Well, hay!
The tea is real!' he repeated, wanting to change the conversation.
Levin looked closely at Wanka Parmenov and his wife.
They were poking a cop near him.
Ivan Parmenov stood on the road, taking, dividing and whispering the huge navilins of the hay, which first with the husks and then with the forks, gave him his beautiful young mistress.
The young woman worked lightly, funny, and cleverly.
The big, tailed hay didn't go straight to the forks. She set it up first, she put it in the forks; then she weighed it with the weight of her body in a firm and swift motion, and immediately she pushed the red cube over her back, straightened out, and, putting the whole breast out of the white curtain, grabbed the hand of the fore with a sly grip, and dripping the navil up high.
Ivan hastened, apparently trying to save her from any minute of unnecessary labor, and he caught her by wide open hands, hand - handed cocktails, and set her on the road.
After the last hay was burgled, the woman fell asleep behind her neck, rubbing a rubbish over her white, unburned forehead with a red handkerchief, and climbed under the cart to tie the ropes.
Ivan taught her how to hold on to a fox, and something she said he laughed out loud.
In the words of both faces, there was strong, young, newly awake love.
The vase was tied up.
Ivan jumped and led a good, fat horse.
Baba scrambled on the pub with a good step, waving her hands, and went to the women who had gathered together.
Ivan, on his way to the road, entered the road with the other horses.
Ladies with rags on their shoulders, glittering with bright flowers and groaning with buzzing, hilarious voices, went behind the hordes.
One brute, wild babie heard the song and sang it again, and, as a matter of urgency, he was picked up again from the beginning of the same song by half a hundred different, rough, and thin, healthy voices.
The women with the song were approaching Levin, and he felt that the cloud with the thunder of joy was coming at him.
The cloud turned, grabbed him, and the cop on which he was lying, and the other cops and the rugs and all the meadows with the far field -- everything went in and jammed under the size of this wild, fun song with screams, whistlings, and jockeys.
Levin was jealous of this healthy fun and wanted to take part in the expression of this joy of life. But there was nothing he could do, and he had to lie down and watch and listen.
When the people with the song disappeared from sight and hearing, Levin became sore for his loneliness, for his physical neglect, for his hostility toward this world.
Some of the same men who argued with him most about hay, those whom he had wronged, or those who wanted to deceive him, were the same men who bowed to him, and apparently they had not, nor could they have, any evil against him, nor just any repentance, but also a reminder that they wanted to deceive him.
It's all drowned in the sea of fun work together. God gave me a day, God gave me strength.
And the day and the strength are devoted to labor, and in it is the reward itself. Who's the job for?
What will be the fruits of labor? These are foreign and null and void considerations.
Levin often admired this life, often feeling jealous of people living this life, but for the first time today, especially under the impression that he had seen in Ivan Parmenov's relationship with his young wife, Levin had, for the first time, made it clear that it was up to him to change the difficult, idle, artificial and personal life he had lived into this working, clean, and general lovely life.
The old man who sat with him went home a long time ago; the people took care of everything.
The Middle East has gone home, and the distant ones have gathered for dinner and sleep in the meadow.
Levin, undetected by the people, continued to lie on the cop and to look, listen, and think.
The people who stayed in the meadow didn't sleep most of the short summer night.
First, I heard a lot of fun talk and a laugh at dinner, and then again, songs and laughter.
The whole long day of work has left no trace of them except for fun.
It was quiet before dawn.
The only sound heard was the silent sound of frogs and horses sniffing through the meadows in the fog up in the morning.
When Levin woke up, he stood up and looked over the stars and realized that the night had passed.
"Well, what am I gonna do?
How am I gonna do that?" 'He said to himself, trying to express to himself all that he had changed his mind and felt on that short night.
Everything he had changed his mind and sensed was divided into three separate moves of thought.
One was a denial of its old life, of its useless knowledge, and of its unnecessary education.
This denial gave him pleasure and was easy and easy for him.
Other thoughts and visions related to the life he wanted to live now.
He felt clearly the simplicity, purity, legitimacy of this life and was convinced that he would find in it the satisfaction, comfort and dignity that he felt so painfully lacking.
But the third set of thoughts turned to the question of how to make this transition from old to new.
And it didn't seem clear to him.
"Wife's name?
Have a job and need a job?
Leave Pokrovsky? Buy the land?
You want me to join the community? Marry a peasant woman?
How am I gonna do that? 'He asked himself again, and found no answer.' 'I haven't slept all night, though, and I can't make myself clear,' he said to himself. 'I'll figure it out later.
One thing is true, this night has decided my fate.
All my old dreams of family life are nonsense, not that,' he said to himself. 'It's all so much simpler and better...'
"How beautiful!" he thought, looking at a strange, like a pearmute shell of white cloud gloves, stopping over his head in the middle of the sky. 'How lovely it is on this lovely night!
And when did this sink get formed?
I recently looked at the sky, and there was nothing on it -- just two white stripes.
Yeah, that's how my outlook on life changed."
He came out of the meadow and walked on a big road to the village.
The breeze rose, and it became gray, dark.
It is now a moment of pasmour, before the usual dawn, full of victory over the darkness.
While shaking with the cold, Levin walked quickly, staring at the ground. "What's that? "Someone is on his way," he thought, after hearing the Burundians, and raised his head.
Forty feet away from him, facing him, on the big ant road he was walking, driving four carriages with screws.
Breathing horses craved from the stakes to the breath, but a crafty dungeon, sitting side by side on the goats, kept his breath on the track, so the wheels ran smoothly.
That was the only thing Levin noticed, and without thinking about who could go, he looked at the carriage in a scattered way.
In the carriage there was an old lady in the corner, and by the window, apparently just woke up, there was a young girl sitting by both hands by the white cap ribbons.
Light and thoughtful, full of graceful and complex inner life alien to Levin, she looked through him at the dawn of the sunrise.
At the very moment, as the sight disappeared, the true eyes looked at him.
She recognized him, and the surprise of joy highlighted her face.
He couldn't have made a mistake.
Only those eyes were there.
There was only one thing in the world that could concentrate the whole world and the meaning of life for him.
It was her.
It was Kitty. He realized she was on her way to Ergushovo from the railway station.
And all that was bothering Levin on that sleepless night, all the decisions he made, all of a sudden, were gone.
He repulsedly remembered his dreams of marrying a peasant woman.
It was only in this fast-distant carriage that moved to the other side of the road, that it was possible to resolve the consternation of his life, which had so painfully burdened him recently.
She didn't look out anymore.
The sound of the ressor stopped being heard, and a little bit of bubbly became heard.
Lai dogs showed that the carriage had passed through and the village -- and left the empty fields, the village ahead, and he himself, lonely and alien, alone on an abandoned large road.
He looked up at the sky, hoping to find the sink he was admiring, which represented the entire course of his thoughts and feelings this night. There was nothing more like a sink in the sky.
There, a mysterious change has already taken place in an unreachable height. There was no trace of the sink, and there was an even, spread over half the sky of the carpet, all the crafty and crafty lambs.
The sky was blue and shining with the same tenderness, but with the same unreachableness answered his questioner's eyes.
'No,' he said to himself, 'as good as this life is, simple and hard to work, I cannot go back to it.
I love her."
No one, except for the closest people to Alexei Alexandrovich, knew that the coldest and wisest man in sight had one, contradicting the general warehouse of his character, a weakness.
Alexey Alexandrovich could not stand to hear and see the tears of a child or woman.
The view of tears led him to a state of confusion, and he lost his complete ability to think.
The ruler of his office and the secretary knew that and warned the applicants not to cry unless they wanted to ruin their business.
"He will be angry and will not listen to you," they said. Indeed, in these cases, the mental disorder caused by the tears in Alexei Alexandrovich was expressed in a rush of anger.
"I can't, I can't do anything.
Let's get out of here!" --he used to scream in these cases.
When Anna returned from the races and told him of her relationship with him and immediately thereafter, closing her face with her hands, crying, he felt, despite his anger toward her, the tide of the mental disorder that had always caused him tears.
Knowing this, and knowing that the expression of his feelings at this moment would not be appropriate, he tried to contain every manifestation of life and therefore did not move or look at it.
That was the strange expression of deadness on his face that struck Anna so hard.
When they came to the house, he dropped her off from the carriage, and made an effort to forgive her with the usual courtesy, and said words that did not bind him at all; he said that he would inform her of his decision tomorrow.
His wife's words, which confirmed his worst doubts, caused severe pain in his heart.
The pain was reinforced by the strange sense of physical pity for her caused by her tears.
But remaining alone in the carriage, Alexis Alexandrovich, to his surprise and joy, he felt a perfect release from that pity and from the doubts and suffering of jealousy that he had recently experienced.
He felt the feeling of a man who pulled out a long toothache. After a terrible pain and a feeling of something huge, bigger than the head itself pulled out of his jaw, a sick man suddenly, without believing yet his happiness, feels that there is no more that has poisoned his life for so long, bound all his attention to himself, and that he can once again live, think, and be interested in more than one of his teeth.
That feeling was felt by Alexi Alexandrovich. The pain was weird and scary, but now it's gone; he felt that he could live again and think of more than one wife.
"With no honor, no heart, no religion, spoiled woman!
I've always known that, and I've always seen it, though I've tried to spare her, to deceive myself,' he said to himself.
And it really seemed to him that he had always seen it; he remembered the details of their past lives, which did not seem to him to be anything wrong before -- these details now made it clear that it had always been spoiled.
"I was wrong to tie my life to her; but there is nothing wrong with my error, and therefore I cannot be unhappy.
'It's not my fault,' he said to himself, 'but it's her.
But I don't care about her.
She doesn't exist for me..."
Anything that affects her and her son, to whom, like her, his feelings have changed, has ceased to occupy him.
One thing that occupied him now was the question of how the best, most decent, most convenient for yourself, and therefore the most just way to get away from the dirt that she splashed in her fall, and to continue on her path of active, honest and beneficial life.
"I can't be unhappy because a contemptible woman has committed a crime; I just have to find the best way out of the difficult situation she puts me in.
And I will find him,' he said to himself, frowning more and more. 'I am not the first, I am not the last.' And, not to mention historical examples, beginning with the refreshing memory of all the Beautiful Elena Menelaus, a number of cases of wives' modern infidelity to the husbands of the highest world have come to light in the imagination of Alexey Alexandrovich.
"Daryalov, Poltava, Prince of Karibanov, Count Pascudine, Drum...
Yeah, and Drama... such an honest, good man...
Semenov, Chagin, Sigonin, remembered Aleksey Alexandrovich. 'Let's say some unreasonable Ridicule falls on these people, but I've never seen anything but misery in it, and I've always sympathized with it,' said Alexandrovich to himself, though it wasn't true, and he never sympathized with this kind of misery, and the more he appreciated himself, the more often there were examples of wives cheating on his husbands.
"It's a disaster that can befall anyone. And that disaster struck me.
It is only a matter of how best to overcome this situation."
And he went over the details of how people were acting in the same position as him.
"Daryalov fought on a duel..."
When he was a young man, due to his physical shyness, he was particularly attracted to the thinking of Alexey Alexandrovich.
Alexey Alexandrovich could not think of a gun, a pointed gun, and had never used any weapon in his life.
This horror of the cold often forced him to think about the duel and to try himself on a situation in which he had to put his life in danger.
Having achieved success and a firm standing in life, he long forgot that feeling; but the habit of feeling took on its own, and fear for its cowardice, and now turned out to be so strong that he thought and caressed about the duel for a long time and from all sides, even though he knew that he would never fight in any way.
"There is no doubt that our society is still so wild (not that in England) that so many -- and among these many were those whose views were particularly dear to Alexi Alexandrovich -- will look at the duel from the good side; but what will be the result?
Let's say I call the duel,' he went on and on about himself, and now he's gonna spend the night he's gonna spend after the call, and the gun he's been pointed at, he shudders and realizes he's never gonna do it,' and I'm gonna call him to a duel.
Let's say I'm being taught,' he kept thinking, 'I'm going to shake the gasht,' he said to himself, closing his eyes, 'and it turns out that I killed him,' he said to himself, and shook his head to drive away these stupid thoughts. 'What is the point of killing a man to determine his relationship with a criminal wife and son?'
Just like I have to decide what I have to do with her.
But what is more likely and certainly will be -- I will be killed or wounded.
I, an innocent man, a victim -- killed or wounded.
Even more pointless.
But it's not enough; the challenge to duel on my part will be unfair.
Don't I know first that my friends will never let me into a duel -- that they won't allow the life of a stateman, the right person in Russia, to be put in danger?
What's gonna happen?
It's gonna be that, knowing ahead that it's never gonna come to any danger, I just wanted to give myself this challenge some false glitter.
It's not fair, it's false, it's the deception of others and myself.
The duel is incredible, and no one expects it from me.
My goal is to ensure that I have the reputation I need to continue my work unhindered."
His work, which had previously been of great importance to him in the eyes of Alexey Alexandrovich, now seemed to him to be particularly significant.
After discussing and rejecting the duel, he turned to divorce, another exit chosen by some of the husbands he remembered.
By reminiscent of all the known divorce cases (there were many in the highest, well - known society), he did not find any where the purpose of the divorce was the one he had in mind.
In all these cases, the husband gave in to or sold the wrong wife, and the party who was not entitled to marry was the one who entered into a false, supposedly legal relationship with the new spouse for the fault.
In his own case, Alexanderovich saw that it was impossible to achieve a legal divorce, that is, a divorce where the guilty wife would only be rejected.
He had seen that the difficult living conditions in which he was living had prevented the harsh evidence required by law to prove his wife &apos; s crime; he had seen that the known sophistication of that life had prevented the use of such evidence, had it been, that the use of such evidence would have dropped him in public opinion more than hers.
A divorce attempt could only lead to a scandalous process that would be a find for enemies, to slander, to humiliate his high position in the light.
The main objective, which is to determine the situation of the least disorder, has not been achieved through divorce.
Moreover, in divorce, even in an attempt to divorce, it was obvious that the wife broke up with her husband and connected with her lover.
And in the soul of Alexey Alexandrovich, despite what he now believed to be a contemptible indifference to her wife, there was a feeling for her that she would not be able to associate freely with Vronski so that her crime would benefit her.
One thought that was so annoying to Alexey Alexandrovich that, only when he imagined it, he had bolted from the inside pain and climbed up and changed the space in the carriage and long after the frownedish had wrapped his filthy and bony feet with a fluffy plaster.
"In addition to the formal divorce, it was possible to do the same thing as the Karibanov, Pascudin and this good Drum, that is, to leave his wife," he continued to think, calmed down; but this measure also represented the same inconvenience of shame as in the divorce, and most importantly, it was, just like a formal divorce, that his wife threw into the arms of Vronski.
"No, it's impossible, it's impossible! 'Then, once again, when he turned over his veil, he spoke out loudly.' 'I can't be unhappy, but neither can she and he be happy.'
The feeling of jealousy that afflicted him at the time of the unknown went away the minute his wife's tooth was ripped out with pain.
But that feeling was replaced by a desire not only that she should not triumph but that she should be rewarded for her crime.
He did not acknowledge that feeling, but deep down, he wanted her to suffer for violating his peace and honour.
And by rediscovering the conditions of the duel, the divorce, the separation and the re-refuting of them, he was convinced that the only way out was to keep it to himself, by keeping it hidden from the light and by using all the dependent measures to stop the communication and, most importantly, not to himself, to punish it.
"I must declare my decision that, after considering the difficult situation she has placed her family in, all the other exits will be worse for both sides than the external status quo, and that I agree to respect it, but under strict conditions of my will, i.e. the termination of the relationship with the lover." In support of this decision, when it was finally made, Alexei Alexandrovich came up with another important consideration.
"It is only with this decision that I do and according to religion," he said to himself, "but with this decision that I do not deny myself to a criminal wife, but I give her the opportunity to correct and even, as hard as it may be for me, to devote a part of my strength to correcting and saving her."
Although he knew that he could have no moral influence over his wife, that nothing would come of all this attempt at correction except a lie; although he did not think once about seeking guidance in religion, now that his decision was in harmony with what he thought was religion, this religious sanction of his decision gave him complete satisfaction in part.
He was happy to think that, even in such a vital work, no one would be able to say that he had not acted according to the rules of the religion that he had always held high among the general coolness and indifference.
In considering further details, he did not even see why his relationship with his wife could not remain the same as before.
There is no doubt that he will never be able to restore his respect to her; but there was and could not be any reason for him to disappoint his life and suffer because she was a bad and faithless wife.
"Yeah, it's gonna take time, all the time, and the relationship is gonna get better," he said to himself, "that is, to the point where I'm not gonna feel disorder in my life.
She shouldn't be happy, but it's not my fault, so I can't be unhappy."
As he approached Petersburg, he had not only given up on the decision, but had also written a letter in his head, which he would write to his wife.
When he entered Switzerland, he took a look at the letters and papers brought by the Ministry and told him to bring them to the office.
'To postpone and not accept anyone,' he said to the doorman, with some pleasure, as a sign of his good spirit, striking the word 'not to accept'.
Alexei Alexandrovich went through the office twice and stopped at a huge desk, on which six candles had already been lit in front of the valet, sliced his fingers and sat down, clearing his writing supplies.
Put his elbows on the table, he leaned his head, thought from a moment to a moment, and began writing without stopping for a second.
He wrote without addressing her and in French, using the term "you", which did not have the character of coldness it had in Russian.
"In our last conversation, I expressed to you my intention to communicate my decision on the subject of this conversation.
Having considered everything carefully, I now write to fulfill that promise.
My decision is that whatever your actions may be, I do not consider myself entitled to sever the bonds that we are bound by from above.
A family cannot be destroyed by whimsy, arbitrary, or even by the crime of one of the spouses, and our lives must go as they did before.
It's necessary for me, for you, for our son.
I am quite certain that you have repented and repented of what is the basis of this letter, and that you will help me to extricate from the root the cause of our discord and forget the past.
Otherwise, you can assume what is expected of you and your son.
I'm hoping to talk about all this in more detail on a personal date.
Since the season is over, I would ask you to move to Petersburg as soon as possible, not later than Tuesday.
All necessary orders for your move will be made.
Please note that I attach particular importance to the execution of this request.
A. Karenin
S. At the same time, the letter contains money that may be needed for your expenses."
He read the letter and was pleased with it, especially the fact that he remembered the money; there was neither a cruel word nor a reproach, nor a condescending one.
Most importantly, there was a golden bridge to return.
By putting the letter together and ironing it with a large, massive knife of ivory and putting it in an envelope with money, he had the pleasure, which was always aroused in it by the treatment of his well - designed writing supplies, to call.
'Tell the courier to deliver Anna Arkadievna to the road tomorrow,' he said, and stood up.
'Listen, Your Excellency; will you have tea in your office?'
Alexey Alexandrovich told me to put tea in the office and, playing with a massive knife, went to the chair, which had a lamp and a French book started on eugubic inscriptions.
There was an oval hanging over the chair, in a gold frame, beautifully painted by a famous painter, Anna's portrait. Alexei Alexandrovich looked at him.
The impermeable eyes scoffed and looked at him like that last night's explanation. Indescribably and indignantly affecting Alexey Alexandrovich, the view made by the artist of black lace on his head, black hair, and a white beautiful hand with an unmarked finger covered with rings.
When he looked at the portrait at once, he shuddered so that his lips shook and sounded "brre" and turned away.
As soon as he sat in the chair, he opened the book.
He tried to read, but he could not restore to himself a very living interest in eugubic inscriptions.
He looked into the book and thought about something else.
He was not thinking of his wife, but of one recent complication in his public activities, which at that time was the main interest of his service.
He felt that he was deeper than ever into this complication and that he was born in his head -- he could say without self-inflicted self-inflicted -- a fundamental thought that had to solve the whole case, raise him in his service career, drop his enemies and therefore bring the greatest benefit to the State.
As soon as the man set the tea, he left the room, he got up and went to the desk.
By moving the portfolio of current cases in the middle, he took the pencil out of the counter with a slight smile of smugness and dived into reading the complex case he had requested before the upcoming complication. It was a complication.
Alexey Alexandrovich's specialty as a statesman was, to him alone, the characteristic characteristic of every protruding official, the one who, along with his tenacious ambition, restraint, honesty and self-confidence, made his career, was neglect of paper officiality, reduction of correspondence, directness to a living cause and economy as far as possible.
On 2 June, the famous commission presented a case of the irrigation of the Zaray Obernia fields at the Ministry of Alexei Alexandrovich, which provided a stark example of infertility and paper.
Alexei Alexandrovich knew it was fair.
The case of the irrigation of the Zaray Obernia fields was initiated by the predecessor of the predecessor, Alexei Alexandrovich.
Indeed, the case was spent and spent a great deal of money and was completely ineffective, and the whole case obviously could not have led to anything.
When he took office, he immediately realized it and wanted to put his hands on the case; but at first, when he felt unsatisfied, he knew that it had affected too much interest and was unreasonable; then, after doing other things, he simply forgot the case.
It, like all things, was on its own, by the power of inertia.
(A lot of people were feeding on this case, especially one very moral and musical family: all daughters were playing string instruments.
Alexei Alexandrovich knew the family and was the father of one of the older daughters.)
It was not fair, according to Alexey Alexandrovich, to raise this case by a hostile ministry, because there were other cases in every ministry that no one, by their known official decency, raised.
Now, if he had already been left with this glove, he had bravely lifted it up and demanded the appointment of a special commission to study and verify the work of the Zaray Obernia irrigation commission; however, he had already given no further descent to those gentlemen.
He also requested the appointment of a special commission in the case concerning the organization of aliens.
The case of the alien device was accidentally raised in the committee on 2 June, and with energy was supported by Alexey Alexandrovich as not subject to delay due to the unfortunate condition of the alien.
In the committee, this led to a debate among several ministries.
The Ministry, hostile to Alexei Alexandrovich, argued that the situation of foreigners had been very flowering and that the proposed restructuring could destroy their prosperity, and if anything was bad, it could only result from the Ministry &apos; s failure to comply with the legal measures prescribed by the law.
Now Alexei Alexandrovich intended to demand: first, that a new commission be set up to examine on the ground the condition of aliens; secondly, if it turns out that the situation of foreigners is indeed the same as that of the official data held by the committee, that another, new scientific commission be appointed to study the reasons for this unhappiness of foreigners in terms of: (a) political, (b) administrative, (c) economic, (g) ethnography, (d) material and (e) religious; thirdly, that information be requested from the hostile ministry on the measures taken by that Ministry over the past decade to prevent the unfavourable conditions in which foreigners are currently present; and fourthly, that an explanation be requested from the Ministry as to why it, as can be seen from the information provided to the committee for NN 17015 and 18308, of 5 December 1863 and 7 June 1864, was directly contrary to the meaning of the indigenous and organic law, i.e., art. 18, and the note to article 36.
The paint of the recovery covered Alexei Alexandrovich's face when he quickly wrote his notes of these thoughts.
After writing a piece of paper, he got up, called and gave a note to the governor of the office to deliver him the necessary papers.
When he stood up and walked through the room, he looked at the portrait again, frowned and smiled in contempt.